Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB431.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4122. Unauthorized dissemination of artificially generated impersonation of individual.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of unauthorized dissemination of an artificially generated impersonation of an individual if, with knowledge or reason to know or believe that the impersonation was artificially generated, the person disseminates an artificially generated impersonation of an individual without the consent of the individual.(b) Grading.--An offense under subsection (a) is:(1) a misdemeanor of the first degree; or123456789101112131415161718 (2) a felony of the third degree, if committed with the intent to defraud or injure another person.(c) Defense.--It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (b)(1) that the person disseminated the artificially generated impersonation with the consent of the individual depicted.(d) Applicability.--A person may be convicted under this section if the victim or the offender is located within this Commonwealth.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to a law enforcement officer engaged in the performance of the law enforcement officer's official duties.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." Includes any of the following:(1) An artificial system that performs tasks under varying and unpredictable circumstances without significant human oversight or that can learn from experience and improve performance when exposed to data sets.(2) An artificial system developed in computer software, physical hardware or other context that solves tasks requiring human-like perception, cognition, planning, learning, communication or physical action.(3) An artificial system designed to think or act like a human, including cognitive architectures and neural networks.(4) A set of techniques, including machine learning, that is designed to approximate a cognitive task.(5) An artificial system designed to act rationally, including an intelligent software agent or embodied robot 20250HB0431PN0405 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that achieves goals using perception, planning, reasoning, learning, communicating, decision making and acting."Artificially generated impersonation." A visual image that appears to show or represent an individual or an auditory vocalization that appears to resemble or represent an individual's voice that did not occur in reality and the production of which image or vocalization was substantially dependent upon technical means, including artificial intelligence or computer software, rather than the ability of an individual to physically mimic another individual.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0431PN0405 - 3 - 1234567891011